Nevada, session 83, AB572.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Pioche
Conservation Camp budget account for the purchase of small
equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ......................................... $317
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ......................................... $317
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Jean
Conservation Camp budget account for the purchase of small
equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $1,590
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $1,590
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Carlin
Conservation Camp budget account for the purchase of small
equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ...................................... $3,786
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $3,786
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Stewart Conservation
Camp budget account the sum of $59,240 for the replacement of a
dishwasher.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Pioche Conservation
Camp budget account the sum of $38,503 for the replacement of
laundry equipment.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Three Lakes Valley
Conservation Camp budget account the sum of $31,384 for the
replacement of propane water heaters.
Sec. 7. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Jean Conservation
Camp budget account the sum of $160,610 for the replacement of
office chairs and laundry equipment.
Sec. 8. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Corrections for the Carlin Conservation
Camp budget account the sum of $31,616 for the replacement of
boilers.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 9. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 4 to 8, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 10. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)